Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 4

City Recorder

6-21-401. City recorder — Appointment.

The city manager shall appoint a city recorder, who also may be appointed to the positions of finance director or treasurer or both.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 11, §§ 1, 15; Shan. Supp., §§ 1997a181, 1997a194; Code 1932, §§ 3578, 3592; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-2114, 6-2127; Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 14.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-21-402. Recorder pro tempore.

In the event of the temporary absence or disability of the recorder, the city manager may appoint a recorder pro tempore.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 11, § 16; Shan. Supp., § 1997a195; Code 1932, § 3593; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2115.

6-21-403. Functions at board meeting.

It is the duty of the recorder to be present at all meetings of the board of commissioners, and to keep a full and accurate record of all business transacted by the same, to be preserved in permanent book form.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 11, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a182; Code 1932, § 3579; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2116.

6-21-404. Custody of official records.

The recorder shall have custody of, and preserve in the recorder's office, the city seal, the public records, original rolls of ordinance, ordinance books, minutes of the board of commissioners, contracts, bonds, title deeds, certificates, and papers, all official indemnity or security bonds, except the recorder's bond, which shall be in the custody of the mayor, and all other bonds, oaths and affirmations, and all other records, papers, and documents not required by this charter or by ordinance to be deposited elsewhere, and register them by numbers, dates, and contents, and keep an accurate and modern index thereof.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 11, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1997a183; Code 1932, § 3580; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2117.

6-21-405. Copies of records and ordinances.

The recorder shall provide, and when required by any officer or person certify, copies of records, papers, and documents in the recorder's office, and charge therefor, for the use of the city, such fees as may be provided by ordinance, cause copies of ordinances to be printed, as may be directed by the board of commissioners, and keep them in the recorder's office for distribution.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 11, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1997a184; Code 1932, § 3581; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2118.